Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2011
Public Counsel; agency; information; recommendations.

(1) If, having considered a complaint and whatever material the Public Counsel deems pertinent, the Public Counsel is of the opinion that an administrative agency should (a) consider the matter further, (b) modify or cancel an administrative act, (c) alter a regulation or ruling, (d) explain more fully the administrative act in question, or (e) take any other step, the Public Counsel shall make recommendations to the administrative agency. The agency may inform the Public Counsel about the action taken on such recommendations or the reasons for not complying with them.

(2) If the Public Counsel believes that an administrative action has been dictated by a statute creating results that are unfair or otherwise objectionable, the Public Counsel shall notify the Legislature of the Public Counsel's views concerning desirable statutory change.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 10, p. 2882;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,249;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 11.